Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Regional Authorities.

§ 43-33-101.
Short title.

Sections 43-33-103 through 43-33-133, inclusive, of this article may be referred to as the “Supplemental Housing Authorities Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7339; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 20; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 4.

§ 43-33-103.
Creation of regional housing authority.

If the board of supervisors of each of two (2) or more contiguous counties by resolution declares that there is a need for one (1) housing authority to be created for all of such counties to exercise in such counties powers and other functions prescribed for a regional housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a regional housing authority shall thereupon exist for all of such counties and exercise its powers and other functions in such counties; and thereupon each county housing authority created for each of such counties shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as hereinafter provided. The board of supervisors of a county shall not adopt a resolution as aforesaid if there is a county housing authority created for such county which has any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness outstanding unless, first, all holders of such evidences of indebtedness consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority on all such evidences of indebtedness, and second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all the rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided. When the above two (2) conditions are complied with and such regional housing authority is created and authorized to exercise its powers and other functions, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations, and property of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority, and all obligations of such county housing authority shall be the obligations of such regional housing authority and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided above, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds; nothing contained in this sentence shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided above.

The board of supervisors of each of two (2) or more contiguous counties shall by resolution declare that there is a need for one (1) regional housing authority to be created for all of such counties to exercise in such counties powers and other functions prescribed for a regional housing authority, if such board of supervisors finds (and only if it finds) (a) that unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford and (b) that a regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit than the housing authority of such county to carry out the purposes of this article and the Housing Authorities Law in such county.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of the regional housing authority, the regional housing authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become created as a public body corporate and politic and to have become established and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers hereunder upon proof of the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors of each of the counties creating the regional housing authority declaring the need for the regional housing authority. Each such resolution shall be deemed sufficient if it declares that there is need for the regional housing authority and finds in substantially the foregoing terms (no further detail being necessary) that the conditions enumerated above in (a) and (b) exist. A copy of such resolution of the board of supervisors of a county, duly certified by the county clerk of such county, shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7323; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 4; Laws, 1944, ch. 218, § 1.

§ 43-33-105.
Area of operation of county and regional housing authorities.

The area of operation of a housing authority created for a county shall include all of the county for which it is created and the area of operation of a regional housing authority shall include (except as otherwise provided elsewhere in this article) all of the counties for which such regional housing authority is created and established. A county or regional housing authority shall not undertake any housing project or projects within the boundaries of any city unless a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such city (and also by any housing authority which shall have been theretofore established and authorized to exercise its powers in such city) declaring that there is a need for the county or regional housing authority to exercise its powers within such city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7324; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 5.

§ 43-33-107.
Increasing area of operation of regional housing authority.

The area of operation of a regional housing authority shall be increased from time to time to include one (1) or more additional contiguous counties not already within a regional housing authority if the board of supervisors of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of such regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the board of supervisors of each such additional county or counties each adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for the inclusion of such additional county or counties in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. Upon the adoption of such resolutions, the county housing authority created for each such additional county shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as hereinafter provided. However, such resolutions shall not be adopted if there is a county housing authority created for any such additional county which has any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness outstanding unless first, all holders of such evidences of indebtedness consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority on all such evidences of indebtedness, and second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all the rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided. When the above conditions are complied with and the area of operation of such regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county, as hereinabove provided, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations, and property of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority, all obligations of such county housing authority shall be the obligations of such regional housing authority and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided above, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds; nothing contained in this sentence shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided above.

The board of supervisors of each of the counties in the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the board of supervisors of each such additional county or counties shall by resolution declare that there is a need for the inclusion of such county or counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, if (a) the board of supervisors of each such additional county or counties finds that unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford and (b) the board of supervisors of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the board of supervisors of each such additional county or counties find that the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit to carry out the purposes of this article and the Housing Authorities Law if the area of operation of the regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county or counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7325; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 6; Laws, 1944, ch. 218, § 2.

§ 43-33-109.
Decreasing area of operation of regional housing authority.

The area of operation of a regional housing authority shall be decreased from time to time to exclude one (1) or more counties from such area if the board of supervisors of each of the counties in such area and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding such county or counties from such area. No action may be taken pursuant to this section if the regional housing authority has outstanding any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, unless first, all holders of such evidences of indebtedness consent in writing to such action. If such action decreases the area of operation of the regional housing authority to only one (1) county, such authority shall thereupon constitute and become a housing authority for such county, in the same manner as though such authority were created by and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers pursuant to Section 43-33-5 of the Housing Authorities Law, and the commissioners of such authority shall be thereupon appointed as provided for the appointment of commissioners of a housing authority created for a county.

The board of supervisors of each of the counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority shall adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding a county or counties from such area if: (a) each such board of supervisors of the counties to remain in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority find that (because of facts arising or determined subsequent to the time when such area first included the county or counties to be excluded) the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit to carry out the purposes of this article and the Housing Authorities Law if such county or counties were excluded from such area, and (b) the board of supervisors of each such county or counties to be excluded and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each also find that (because of the aforesaid changed facts) the purposes of this article and the Housing Authorities Law could be carried out more efficiently or economically in such county or counties if the area of operation of the regional housing authority did not include such county or counties.

Any property held by a regional housing authority within a county or counties excluded from the area of operation of such authority, as herein provided, shall (as soon as practicable after the exclusion of said county or counties respectively) be disposed of by such authority in the public interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7326; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 7.

§ 43-33-111.
Housing authority for county excluded from regional authority.

At any time after a county or counties is excluded from the area of operation of a regional housing authority as provided in Section 43-33-109, the board of supervisors of any such county may adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for a housing authority in the county, if the board shall find such need according to the provisions of Section 43-33-5 of the Housing Authorities Law. Thereupon a public body corporate and politic to be known as the housing authority of the county shall exist for such county and may transact business and exercise its powers in the same manner as though created by said Section 43-33-5. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as preventing such county from thereafter being included within the area of operation of a regional housing authority as provided in Sections 43-33-103 or 43-33-107 of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7327; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 8.

§ 43-33-113.
Public hearing to create regional authority or change its area of operation.

The board of supervisors of a county shall not adopt any resolution authorized by Sections 43-33-103, 43-33-107 or 43-33-109 of this article unless a public hearing has first been held. The clerk of such county shall give notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing at least ten (10) days prior to the day on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper published in such county, or if there is no newspaper published in such county, then in a newspaper published in the state and having a general circulation in such county. Upon the date fixed for such public hearing an opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents of such county and to all other interested persons.

In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or unsanitary the board of supervisors of a county shall take into consideration the safety and sanitation of dwellings, the light and air space available to the inhabitants of such dwellings, the degree of overcrowding, the size and arrangement of the rooms and the extent to which conditions exist in such dwellings which endanger life or property by fire or other causes.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of other obligations, a regional housing authority may covenant as to limitations on its right to adopt resolutions relating to the increase or decrease of its area of operation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7328; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 9.

§ 43-33-115.
Commissioners of regional housing authority.

The board of supervisors of each county included in a regional housing authority shall appoint one (1) person as a commissioner of such authority, and each such commissioner to be first appointed by the board of supervisors of a county may be appointed at or after the time of the adoption of the resolution declaring the need for such regional housing authority or declaring the need for the inclusion of such county in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. When the area of operation of a regional housing authority is increased to include an additional county or counties as provided above, the board of supervisors of each such county shall thereupon appoint one (1) additional person as a commissioner of the regional housing authority. The board of supervisors of each county shall appoint the successor of the commissioner appointed by it. A certificate of the appointment of any such commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the county, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. If any county is excluded from the area of operation of a regional housing authority, the office of the commissioner of such regional housing authority appointed by the board of supervisors of such county shall be thereupon abolished.

If the area of operation of a regional housing authority consists at any time of an even number of counties, the commissioners of the regional housing authority appointed by the boards of supervisors of such counties shall appoint one (1) additional commissioner whose term of office shall be as herein provided for a commissioner of a regional housing authority except that such term shall end at any earlier time that the area of operation of the regional housing authority shall be changed to consist of an odd number of counties. The commissioners of such authority appointed by the boards of supervisors of such counties shall likewise appoint each person to succeed such additional commissioner; the term of office of such person begins during the terms of office of the commissioner appointing him. A certificate of the appointment of any such additional commissioner of such regional housing authority shall be filed with the other records of the regional housing authority and shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such additional commissioner.

At least one (1) commissioner of a regional housing authority must be a person who is directly assisted by the authority if required under applicable federal law.

The commissioners of a regional housing authority shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified, except as otherwise provided herein.

The commissioners shall constitute the regional housing authority, and the powers of such authority shall be vested in such commissioners in office from time to time.

The commissioners of a regional housing authority shall elect a chairman from among the commissioners and shall have power to select or employ such other officers and employees as the regional housing authority may require. A majority of the commissioners of a regional housing authority shall constitute a quorum of such authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. In the event that a directly assisted commissioner ceases to be directly assisted by the authority for which he/she serves as commissioner, said person shall then become disqualified to serve that authority as a directly assisted commissioner and shall be replaced as commissioner by a person who is directly assisted by the authority if federal law then requires that authority to have a directly assisted commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7329; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 10; Laws, 2002, ch. 484, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2002.).

§ 43-33-117.
Powers of regional housing authority.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a regional housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such regional housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities and limitations provided for housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities, and all the provisions of law applicable to housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such authorities shall be applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof. For such purposes, the term “mayor” or “governing body” as used in the Housing Authorities Law shall be construed as meaning “board of supervisors,” unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context. A regional housing authority shall have power to select any appropriate corporate name.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7330; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 11; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 1.

§ 43-33-119.
Rural housing projects.

County housing authorities and regional housing authorities are specifically empowered and authorized to borrow money, accept grants and exercise their other powers to provide housing on farms or in other areas outside of cities. With respect to such housing, county and regional housing authorities shall not be subject to the limitations provided in clause (c) of Section 43-33-15 of the Housing Authorities Law. Any such housing authority may rent, sell, or make loans to finance the cost of such housing, and make or accept such conveyances, purchase agreements or leases as it deems necessary to assure the achievement of the objectives of this article and the Housing Authorities Law. Such leases, agreements or conveyances may include such covenants as the housing authority deems appropriate regarding the housing and the tracts of land described in any such instrument, which covenants shall be deemed to run with the land where the housing authority deems it necessary and the parties to such instrument so stipulate. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting any other powers of any housing authority.

Until a purchaser makes full payment for a dwelling which is constructed by an authority on a farm, such dwelling shall continue to be the property of the authority regardless of the title to the land on which it is constructed, and such dwelling shall be exempt from taxation in the same manner as other property of the authority. Any document making land available for use by an authority shall be admitted to record, and accordingly constitute notice, in the same manner as a deed or other instrument relating to real estate.

When an authority provides a dwelling on a farm hereunder, the owner of the farm living in the dwelling under a lease or purchase agreement shall be entitled to receive the same homestead exemption as if he had title to the dwelling.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7331; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 12; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 2.

§ 43-33-121.
Housing applications by farmers.

The owner of any farm operated, or worked upon, by farmers of low income in need of safe and sanitary housing may file an application with a county housing authority or a regional housing authority requesting that it provide for a safe and sanitary dwelling or dwellings for occupancy by such farmers of low income. Such applications shall be received and examined by housing authorities in connection with the formulation of projects or programs to provide housing for farmers of low income.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7332; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 13.

§ 43-33-123.
“Farmers of low income” defined.

“Farmers of low income” as used in this article shall mean persons or families who (1) derive their principal income from operating or working upon a farm; (2) whose average net income is less than the amount which is necessary (as determined by the authority operating in that area) to enable them, without financial assistance, to obtain or provide themselves with decent, safe and sanitary housing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7333; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 14; Laws, 1946, ch. 40, § 3.

§ 43-33-125.
Consolidated housing authority.

If the governing body of each of two (2) or more municipalities (whether or not contiguous) by resolution declares that there is a need for one (1) housing authority to be created for all of such municipalities to exercise in such municipalities the powers and other functions prescribed for a housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a consolidated housing authority (with such corporate name as it selects) shall thereupon exist for all of such municipalities and exercise its powers and other functions within its area of operation (as herein defined), including the power to undertake projects therein; and thereupon each housing authority (if any) created for each of such municipalities shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed of its real property to the consolidated housing authority. The creation of a consolidated housing authority and the finding of need therefor shall be subject to the same provisions and limitations of this article as are applicable to the creation of a regional housing authority and that all of the provisions of this article applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof shall be applicable to consolidated housing authorities and the commissioners thereof. The area of operation of a consolidated housing authority shall include all of the territory within the boundaries of each municipality joining in the creation of such authority together with the territory within five (5) miles of the boundaries of each such municipality, except that such area of operation may be changed to include or exclude any municipality or municipalities (with its aforesaid surrounding territory) in the same manner and under the same provisions as provided in this article for changing the area of operation of a regional housing authority by including or excluding a county or counties. For all such purposes the term “board of supervisors” shall be construed as meaning “governing body”, except in Section 43-33-115 of this article where it shall be construed as meaning “mayor” or other executive head of the municipality, the term “county” shall be construed as meaning “municipality”, and the terms “county housing authority” and “regional housing authority” shall be construed as meaning “housing authority of the city” and “consolidated housing authority,” respectively, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context.

The governing body of a municipality for which a housing authority has not been created shall not adopt the above resolution unless it first declares that there is a need for a housing authority to function in said municipality, which declaration shall be made in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as the declaration of the governing body of a city required by Section 43-33-5 of the Housing Authorities Law for the purpose of authorizing a housing authority created for a city to transact business and exercise its powers.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a consolidated housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such consolidated housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities and limitations as those provided for housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities, in the same manner as though all the provisions of law applicable to housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties were applicable to consolidated housing authorities.

The term “municipality” as used in this article shall mean any city, town, village or other municipality in the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7334; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 15.

§ 43-33-127.
Housing authority operations in other municipalities.

In addition to its other powers, a housing authority created for a city may exercise any or all of its powers within the territorial boundaries of any other municipality not included in the area of operation of such housing authority, for the purpose of planning, undertaking, financing, constructing and operating a housing project or projects within such municipality, provided that a resolution shall have been adopted (a) by the governing body of such municipality in which the authority is to exercise its powers and (b) by the housing authority of such municipality (if one has been theretofore established by such municipality and authorized to exercise its powers therein) declaring that there is a need for the housing authority of the aforesaid city to exercise its powers within such municipality. A municipality shall have the same powers to furnish financial and other assistance to a housing authority exercising its powers within such municipality under this section as though the municipality were within the area of operation of such authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7335; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 16.

§ 43-33-129.
Findings required for authority to operate in municipality.

No governing body of a city or other municipality shall adopt a resolution as provided in Sections 43-33-105 or 43-33-127 declaring that there is a need for a housing authority (other than a housing authority established by such municipality) to exercise its powers within such municipality, unless a public hearing has first been held by such governing body and unless such governing body shall have found in substantially the following terms: (a) that unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such municipality or that there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such municipality available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and (b) that these conditions can be best remedied through the exercise of the aforesaid housing authority’s powers within the territorial boundaries of such municipality. Such findings shall not have the effect of establishing a housing authority for any such municipality under the Housing Authorities Law nor of thereafter preventing such municipality from establishing a housing authority or joining in the creation of a consolidated housing authority or the increase of the area of operation of a consolidated housing authority. The clerk of the city or other municipality shall give notice of the time, place and purpose of the public hearing at least ten (10) days prior to the date on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper published in such municipality, or if there is no newspaper published in such municipality, then in a newspaper published in the state and having a general circulation in such municipality. Upon the date fixed for such public hearing an opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents of such municipality and to all other interested persons.

During the time that, pursuant to these findings, a housing authority has outstanding (or is under contract to issue) any evidences of indebtedness for a project within the city or other municipality, no other housing authority may undertake a project within such municipality without the consent of said housing authority which has such outstanding indebtedness or obligation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7336; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 17.

§ 43-33-131.
Meetings and residence of commissioners.

Nothing contained in this article or the Housing Authorities Law shall be construed to prevent meetings of the commissioners of a housing authority anywhere within the perimeter boundaries of the area of operation of the authority or within any additional area where the housing authority is authorized to undertake a housing project, nor to prevent the appointment of any person as a commissioner of the authority who resides within such boundaries or such additional area, and who is otherwise eligible for such appointment under this article or the Housing Authorities Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7337; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 18.

§ 43-33-133.
Agreement to sell as security for obligations to federal government.

In any contract or amendatory or superseding contract for a loan and annual contributions heretofore or hereafter entered into between a housing authority (as defined in the Housing Authorities Law) and the federal government, or any agency thereof, with respect to any housing project undertaken by said housing authority, any such housing authority is authorized to make such covenants (including covenants with holders of obligations of said authority issued for purposes of the project involved), and to confer upon the federal government, or any agency thereof, such rights and remedies, as said housing authority deems necessary to assure the fulfillment of the purposes for which the project was undertaken. In any such contract, the housing authority may, notwithstanding any other provisions of law, agree to sell and convey the project (including all lands appertaining thereto) to which such contract relates to the federal government, or any agency thereof, upon the occurrence of such conditions, or upon such defaults on obligations for which any of the annual contributions provided in said contract are pledged, as may be prescribed in such contract, and at a price (which may include the assumption by the federal government, or any agency thereof, of the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations of the housing authority issued for purposes of the project involved) determined as prescribed therein and upon such other terms and conditions as are therein provided. Any such housing authority is hereby authorized to enter into such supplementary contracts, and to execute such conveyances, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions hereof. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any contracts or supplementary contracts or conveyances made or executed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be or constitute a mortgage within the meaning or for the purposes of any of the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7338; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 19.

§ 43-33-135.
Supplemental nature of article.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7340; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 21; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 8.

§ 43-33-137.
Article controlling.

In so far as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7341; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 22; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 10.